Utah statutes.
7-1-321.   Powers and duties of commissioner to carry out purposes of title.
The commissioner shall have such other powers, duties, and responsibilities as
shall be necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions and purposes of
this title and to prevent evasion thereof, to promote and insure the safety,
soundness, and stability of institutions subject to the jurisdiction of the
department or to protect the interest of depositors and other customers of the
institutions.
